Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TRANSFER; EMERGING ENTREPRENEUR LOAN PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is transferred from the general fund to the emerging entrepreneur program special revenue fund account under Minnesota Statutes, section 116M.18. The commissioner of employment and economic development may use up to four percent of this transfer for administration and monitoring of the program. This is a onetime transfer. new text end